Maine, session 132, LD479.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3115, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 529, §6, is further
amended to read:
B. For the report required by this subsection that is due February 15, 2026, and for
each subsequent report, the department shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) Any recommendations for necessary adjustments to the amount of the handling
fee under section 3106, subsection 7; and
(2) Information regarding the status of the Cost and Carbon Efficient Technology
Fund under section 3114‑A, including, but not limited to, information regarding
the number and amount of grants issued under that fund, information on the
recipients of those grants and the technology that those grants were used to
support.; and
(3) An evaluation and recommendations, including draft legislation as necessary,
regarding the inclusion within the scope of this chapter of additional container sizes
and types used to contain beverages or other consumer products that are not
beverages.
Sec. 2. Department of Environmental Protection; beverage container
redemption program report. The Department of Environmental Protection, in the
report required by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 3115, subsection 3 that is
due February 15, 2026, in evaluating the inclusion of additional container sizes and types
within the scope of Title 38, chapter 33, as required by Title 38, section 3115, subsection
3, paragraph B, subparagraph (3), shall, at a minimum, evaluate and provide
recommendations, including draft legislation as necessary, regarding the inclusion under
the beverage container redemption program of clear glass containers that contain consumer
products that are not beverages.